Wyoming, session 2025, HB0255.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-2-502(b)(i) is amended to read:

31-2-502. Exclusions.

(b) If a mobile home is installed on a permanent
foundation and is taxable as real property:

(i) The certificate of title or manufacturer's
certificate of origin, if any, shall be surrendered to and
HB0255

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0719
cancelled by the county clerk of the county in which the
mobile home is located except that no title shall be
cancelled under this subsection unless all liens on the
home have been released. The county clerk may require the
person surrendering the title for cancellation to disclose
information necessary to determine whether cancellation is
proper under law. The county clerk shall issue a document
certifying the cancellation of the certificate of title for
recording in the real estate records of the county clerk of
the county in which the mobile home is located;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0255